Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.105

Competitive bidding—Written protests—Notice of contract execution.

(1) Within two business days of the bid opening on a public works project that is the subject of competitive bids, the municipality must provide, if requested by a bidder, copies of the bids the municipality received for the project. The municipality shall then allow at least two full business days after providing bidders with copies of all bids before executing a contract for the project. Intermediate Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are not counted.

(2) When a municipality receives a written protest from a bidder for a public works project that is the subject of competitive bids, the municipality must not execute a contract for the project with anyone other than the protesting bidder without first providing at least two full business days' written notice of the municipality's intent to execute a contract for the project; provided that the protesting bidder submits notice in writing of its protest no later than:

(a) Two full business days following bid opening, if no bidder requested copies of the bids received for the project under subsection (1) of this section; or

(b) Two full business days following when the municipality provided copies of the bids to those bidders requesting bids under subsection (1) of this section. Intermediate Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays are not counted.

[ 2019 c 434 s 13; 2003 c 300 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2019 c 434: See note following RCW 35.23.352.